Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1502
Director; oath; bond or insurance.

The Director of Motor Vehicles shall take the oath as provided by law and be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201.

Laws 1957, c. 366, § 55, p. 1284;

Laws 1978, LB 653, § 22;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 33.